Alabama, session 2026rs, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
42 Section 1. Sections 32-9-20, 32-9-29, and 32-9C-6, Code
43 of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
44 "§32-9-20
45 (a) It shall be unlawful for any individual to drive or
46 move on any highway in this state any vehicle of a size or
47 weight except in accordance with the following:
48 (1) HEIGHT. No vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer shall
49 exceed in height 13 1/2 feet, including load.
50 (2) LENGTH. No vehicle shall exceed in length 40 feet;
51 except, that the length of a truck-semitrailer combination,
52 semitrailers, including load, used in a truck
53 tractor-semitrailer combination, shall not exceed 57 feet;
54 semitrailers and trailers, including load, used in a truck
55 tractor-semitrailer-trailer combination, shall not exceed 28
56 1/2 feet each; and motor vehicles designed, used, or
Page 2

1/2 feet each; and motor vehicles designed, used, or
57 maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or
58 commercial space, commonly called motor homes, shall not
59 exceed 45 feet. Semitrailers exceeding 53 1/2 feet shall only
60 be operated on highways designated pursuant to Section 32-9-1
61 and shall only be operated when the distance between the
62 kingpin of a semitrailer and the rearmost axle or a point
63 midway between the two rear axles, if the two rear axles are
64 tandem axles, does not exceed 41 feet and if the semitrailer
65 is equipped with a rear underride guard of a substantial
66 construction consisting of a continuous lateral beam extending
67 to within four inches of the lateral extremities of the
68 semitrailer and located not more than 22 inches from the
69 surface as measured with the semitrailer empty and on a level
70 surface. For purposes of enforcement of this subdivision,
71 lengths of semitrailers and trailers refer to the cargo
72 carrying portion of the unit. Truck tractor units used
73 exclusively in combinations transporting motor vehicles may
74 directly carry a portion of the cargo, provided that the
75 combinations are restricted to truck tractor-semitrailer
76 combinations only and provided further that the overall length
77 of these particular combinations shall not exceed 65 feet;
78 except that the overall length of stinger-steered type units
79 shall not exceed 80 feet. No truck tractor-semitrailer
80 combination used exclusively for transporting motor vehicles
81 shall carry any load extending more than four feet beyond the
82 front or six feet beyond the rear of the combination. No other
83 vehicle operated on a highway shall carry any load extending
84 more than a total of five feet beyond both the front and rear,
Page 3

more than a total of five feet beyond both the front and rear,
85 inclusive, of the vehicle.
86 (3) WEIGHT.
87 a.1. Axle Weight. The gross weight imposed on the
88 highway by the wheels of any one axle of a vehicle shall not
89 exceed 20,000 pounds, or other weight, if any, as may be
90 permitted by federal law to keep the state from losing federal
91 funds; provided, that inadequate bridges shall be posted to
92 define load limits.
93 2. For the purpose of this subdivision, an "axle load"
94 shall be defined as the total load transmitted to the road by
95 all wheels whose centers are included between two parallel
96 transverse vertical planes 40 inches apart, extending across
97 the full width of the vehicle.
98 3. Vehicles and combinations of vehicles shall not
99 operate on the Interstate Highway System of Alabama that have
100 a weight greater than 20,000 pounds carried on any one axle,
101 including the allowable load tolerance, or with a tandem axle
102 weight in excess of 34,000 pounds, including the allowable
103 load tolerance, or overall gross weight on a group of two or
104 more consecutive axles produced by application of the
105 following formula:
106 W=500 (LN/(N-1) + 12N + 36)
107 where W = overall gross weight on any group of two or
108 more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds, L = distance
109 in feet between the extreme of any group of two or more
110 consecutive axles, and N = number of axles in the group under
111 consideration; except, that two consecutive sets of tandem
112 axles may carry a gross load of 34,000 pounds each, provided
Page 4

axles may carry a gross load of 34,000 pounds each, provided
113 the overall distance between the first and last axles of the
114 consecutive sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more and the
115 overall gross weight may not exceed 80,000 pounds, including
116 the allowable load tolerance.
117 b. Gross Weight. Subject to the limit upon the weight
118 imposed upon the highway through any one axle as set forth
119 herein, the total weight with load imposed upon the highway by
120 all the axles of a vehicle or combination of vehicles shall
121 not exceed the gross weight given for the respective distances
122 between the first and last axle of the vehicle or combination
123 of vehicles, measured longitudinally to the nearest foot as
124 set forth in the following table:
125 COMPUTED GROSS WEIGHT TABLE
126 For various spacings of axle groupings
127 Distance in feet between first and last Maximum load in
128 axles of vehicle or combination of pounds on all the
129 vehicles axles
130 2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles
131 8 or less 36,000 42,000 42,000
132 9 38,000 42,500 42,500
133 10 40,000 43,500 43,500
134 11 44,000 44,000
135 12 45,000 50,000 50,000
136 13 45,500 50,500 50,500
137 14 46,500 51,500 51,500
138 15 47,000 52,000 52,000
139 16 48,000 52,500 58,000 58,000
Page 5

16 48,000 52,500 58,000 58,000
140 17 48,500 53,500 58,500 58,500
141 18 49,500 54,000 59,000 59,000
142 19 50,000 54,500 60,000 60,000
143 20 51,000 55,500 60,500 66,000
144 21 51,500 56,000 61,000 66,500
145 22 52,500 56,500 61,500 67,000
146 23 53,000 57,500 62,500 68,000
147 24 54,000 58,000 63,000 68,500
148 25 54,500 58,500 63,500 69,000
149 26 56,000 59,500 64,000 69,500
150 27 57,000 60,000 65,000 70,000
151 28 59,000 60,500 65,500 71,000
152 29 60,000 61,500 66,000 71,500
153 30 62,000 66,500 72,000
154 31 63,500 67,000 72,500
155 32 64,500 68,000 73,500
156 33 65,000 69,000 74,000
157 34 65,500 70,000 74,500
158 35 66,500 71,000 75,000
159 36 67,000 72,000 76,000
160 37 68,000 73,000 77,000
161 38 69,000 74,000 78,000
162 39 70,000 75,000 79,000
163 40 71,000 76,000 80,000
164 41 72,000 77,000 81,000
165 42 73,000 78,000 82,000
Page 6

42 73,000 78,000 82,000
166 43 74,000 79,000 83,000
167 44 and over 75,000 80,000 84,000
168 c. Special Permits. Except as provided by special
169 permits, no vehicle or combination of vehicles exceeding the
170 gross weights specified in paragraph a. or b. shall be
171 permitted to travel on the public highways within the State of
172 Alabama.
173 d.1. Allowable Load Tolerance. For purposes of
174 enforcing this subdivision, all weights less than or equal to
175 the sum of the weight otherwise prescribed by this
176 subdivision, plus the allowable load tolerance, shall be
177 deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this
178 section and shall not constitute violations thereof. No
179 evidence shall be admitted into evidence or considered by the
180 trier of fact in any civil action unless the evidence
181 proffered would tend to prove that the weight of the vehicle
182 exceeded the amount provided in this subsection. Nothing in
183 this paragraph shall restrict or affect the right of any
184 defendant to place in evidence such evidence tending to prove
185 the defendant was in compliance with this section.
186 2. For the purposes of this subdivision, the allowable
187 load tolerance is calculated by multiplying the weight
188 prescribed by this subdivision by one-tenth (.10).
189 e. Special Trucks.
190 1. Dump trucks, dump trailers, concrete mixing trucks,
191 fuel oil, gasoline trucks, and trucks designated and
192 constructed for special type work or use shall not be made to
193 conform to the axle spacing requirements of paragraph b.,
Page 7

conform to the axle spacing requirements of paragraph b.,
194 provided that the vehicle shall be limited to a weight of
195 20,000 pounds per axle plus the allowable load tolerance; and,
196 provided further, that the maximum gross weight of the vehicle
197 shall not exceed the maximum weight allowed by this section
198 for the appropriate number of axles, irrespective of the
199 distance between axles, plus the allowable load tolerance. All
200 axles shall be brake equipped.
201 2. Trucks delivering asphalt plant mix that do not
202 exceed the maximum allowable gross weight and operate within
203 50 miles of their home base shall not be required to conform
204 to the requirements of paragraph a.
205 3. Concrete mixing trucks that operate within 50 miles
206 of their home base and do not exceed the maximum allowable
207 gross weight shall not be required to conform to the
208 requirements of paragraph a.
209 4. It is a violation if a vehicle named under this
210 paragraph travels upon bridges designated and posted by the
211 Director of Transportation as incapable of carrying the load.
212 f. Driver Compliance. If the driver of any vehicle can
213 comply with the weight requirements of this section by
214 shifting or equalizing the load on all wheels or axles and
215 does so when requested by the proper authority, the driver
216 shall not be held to be operating in violation of this
217 section.
218 g. Portable Scales.
219 1. Portable scales may be used to enforce this section.
220 To determine the weight of each axle, the axles of any vehicle
221 described or commonly referred to as tandem or triaxle rigs or
Page 8

described or commonly referred to as tandem or triaxle rigs or
222 units, that is, vehicles having two or more axles in addition
223 to a steering axle, shall be weighed simultaneously, and the
224 total weight so derived shall be divided by the number of
225 axles weighed in the group to arrive at the per axle weight,
226 except that if any one axle in the group exceeds 20,000 pounds
227 in weight, it shall not exceed the weight of any other axle in
228 the group by more than 50 percent.
229 2. When portable scales are used to enforce this
230 section and either the axle weight or the gross weight of a
231 vehicle is determined to be in violation of this section, if
232 the operator of the vehicle believes that the determination of
233 a violation is based on inaccuracies of the portable scales,
234 the operator may do either of the following:
235 (i) Request that an enforcement officer accompany the
236 operator and vehicle to the nearest platform scales certified
237 by the Department of Agriculture and Industries and operated
238 by a bonded operator within a distance of 10 highway miles to
239 verify the accuracy of the portable scales used in determining
240 the axle weight or gross weight of the vehicle. If the axle
241 weights or gross weight of the vehicle is shown by the
242 platform scales to be within the legal limits of this section,
243 including the allowable load tolerance, the operator of the
244 vehicle shall not be held to be in violation of this section.
245 (ii) Proceed with the vehicle to the nearest platform
246 scales certified by the Department of Agriculture and
247 Industries and operated by a bonded operator within a distance
248 of 100 highway miles to verify the accuracy of the portable
249 scales used in determining the axle weight or gross weight of
Page 9

scales used in determining the axle weight or gross weight of
250 the vehicle without being accompanied by an enforcement
251 officer. If the axle weights or gross weight of the vehicle is
252 shown by the platform scales to be within the legal limits of
253 this section, including the allowable load tolerance, the
254 operator of the vehicle shall not be held to be in violation
255 of this section upon providing a copy of the platform scale
256 weight ticket and an affidavit, to be established and provided
257 online by the court having jurisdiction over this matter
258 within 48 hours of being weighed by the portable scales. Upon
259 complying with this section, no court costs, fees, or
260 penalties shall apply.
261 3. When using portable scales to enforce this section,
262 not more than five vehicles may be detained at any one time,
263 including a vehicle being weighed.
264 h. County Highways. The governing body of a county, by
265 appropriate resolution, may authorize limitations less than
266 those prescribed in this section for vehicles operated upon
267 the county highways of the county.
268 i. Posted Roads and Bridges. The Department of
269 Transportation may post or limit any road or bridge to weights
270 less than those prescribed by this section. It is the
271 legislative intent and purpose that this section be rigidly
272 enforced by the Department of Transportation, the Alabama
273 State Law Enforcement Agency, any other authorized law
274 enforcement officer of this state, and any county, city, and
275 incorporated town.
276 j. Agricultural Commodities. Two and three axle
277 vehicles being used exclusively for the purpose of
Page 10

vehicles being used exclusively for the purpose of
278 transporting agricultural commodities or products to and from
279 a farm and for agricultural purposes relating to the operation
280 and maintenance of a farm by any farmer, custom harvester, or
281 husbandman may not be made to conform to the axle requirements
282 of paragraph a. or the gross weight requirements of paragraph
283 b.
284 (4) WIDTH. Vehicles and combinations of vehicles
285 operating on highways shall not exceed a total outside width,
286 including any load thereon, of 102 inches, exclusive of
287 mirrors, automated driving system (ADS) equipment, or other
288 safety devices approved by the Department of Transportation.
289 No passenger vehicle shall carry any load extending beyond the
290 line of the fenders. No vehicle hauling forest products or
291 culvert pipe on any highway shall have a load exceeding 102
292 inches in width. For purposes of this subdivision, ADS
293 equipment includes equipment that is an integral part of an
294 automated driving system, including, but not limited to,
295 appurtenances such as sensors, cameras, and lighting
296 equipment, provided the equipment is not used as a
297 load-carrying device and the total outside width of the
298 appurtenances, as measured from the outside edges of such,
299 does not exceed 122 inches.
300 (b)(1) Any vehicle utilizing an auxiliary power or idle
301 reduction technology unit in order to promote reduction of
302 fuel use and emissions because of engine idling shall be
303 allowed an additional 400 pounds total to the gross, axle,
304 tandem, or bridge formula weight limits defined in this
305 section.
Page 11

section.
306 (2) To be eligible for the exception provided in this
307 subsection, the operator of the vehicle must provide written
308 proof or certification of the weight of the auxiliary power
309 unit (APU) and demonstrate or certify the idle reduction
310 technology is fully functional at all times.
311 (3) Written proof or certification of the weight of the
312 APU must be available to law enforcement officers if the
313 vehicle is found in violation of applicable weight laws. The
314 weight allowed may not exceed 400 pounds or the actual weight
315 proven or certified, whichever is less.
316 (4) It is the intent of this subsection to apply at the
317 state highway level the weight limit increase for vehicles
318 using a functioning auxiliary power or idle reduction
319 technology as provided in the Federal Energy Policy Act of
320 2005.
321 (c)(1) Any motor vehicle, if operated by an engine
322 fueled primarily by natural gas, may exceed any vehicle weight
323 limit, up to a maximum gross vehicle weight of 82,000 pounds,
324 under this section by an amount that is equal to the
325 difference between:
326 a. The weight of the vehicle attributable to the
327 natural gas tank and fueling system carried by that vehicle;
328 and
329 b. The weight of a comparable diesel tank and fueling
330 system.
331 (2) This subsection applies on federal interstate
332 highways to the weight limit increases for vehicles using an
333 EPA certified natural gas engine or an EPA approved conversion
Page 12

EPA certified natural gas engine or an EPA approved conversion
334 unit installed on the vehicle that allows the vehicle to
335 operate primarily on compressed natural gas or liquefied
336 natural gas.
337 (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
338 effectuating either of the following:
339 (1) Permitting size or weight limits on the National
340 System of Interstate and Defense Highways in this state in
341 excess of those permitted under 23 U.S.C. § 127. If the
342 federal government prescribes or adopts vehicle size or weight
343 limits greater than or less than those now prescribed by 23
344 U.S.C. § 127 for the National System of Interstate and Defense
345 Highways, the increased or decreased limits shall become
346 effective on the National System of Interstate and Defense
347 Highways in this state.
348 (2) Denying the operation of any vehicle or combination
349 of vehicles that could be lawfully operated upon the highways
350 and roads of this state on January 4, 1975."
351 "§32-9-29
352 (a) Authorized; application; issuance; seasonal, etc.,
353 limitations; refusal, revocation, or cancellation.
354 (1) The Director of the State Department of
355 Transportation or the official of the department designated by
356 the director, upon application and for good cause being shown
357 therefor, may issue a permit in writing authorizing the
358 applicant to operate or move upon the state's public roads a
359 vehicle or combination of no more than two vehicles and loads
360 whose weight, width, length, or height, or combination
361 thereof, exceeds the maximum limit specified by law;,
Page 13

thereof, exceeds the maximum limit specified by law;,
362 provided, that the load transported by such vehicle or
363 vehicles is of such nature that it is a unit whichthat cannot
364 be readily dismantled or separated;, provided, however, that
365 bulldozers and similar construction equipment shall not be
366 deemed readily separable for purposes of this chapter; and
367 further provided, that no permit shall be issued to any
368 vehicle whose operation upon the public roads of this state
369 threatens to unduly damage a road or any appurtenances
370 thereto.
371 (2) Permits may be issued on application to the
372 department to persons, firms, or corporationsindividuals or
373 entities. The director shall adopt reasonable rules whichthat
374 are necessary or desirable governing the issuance of the
375 permits; provided, that the. The rules shall not conflict with
376 this title and other provisions of law.
377 (3) The original copy of every permit shall be carried
378 in the vehicle itself and shall be open to inspection by any
379 law enforcement officer or authorized agent of the department.
380 (4) The application for any permit shall specifically
381 describe the type of permit applied for, as described in
382 subsection (b), and the application for a single trip permit,
383 in addition, shall describe the points of departure and
384 destination.
385 (5) The director or the official of the department
386 designated by the director may withhold sucha permit or, if
387 sucha permit is issued, may establish seasonal or other time
388 limitations within which the vehicles described may be
389 operated on the public road indicated, or may otherwise limit
Page 14

operated on the public road indicated, or may otherwise limit
390 or prescribe conditions of operation of suchthe vehicle, when
391 necessary to assure against undue damage to the road
392 foundation, surfaces, or bridge structures, and may require
393 such undertaking or other security as may be deemed necessary
394 to compensate the state for any injury to any roadway or
395 bridge structure.
396 (6) For just cause, including, but not limited to,
397 repeated and consistent past violations, the director or an
398 official of the department designated by the director may
399 refuse to issue, or may cancel, suspend, or revoke, the permit
400 of an applicant or permittee.
401 (b) Duration and limits of permits; bond or insurance
402 requirements.
403 (1)a. ANNUAL. The director or the official of the
404 department designated by the director, pursuant to this
405 section, may issue an annual permit which shall permit the
406 vehicle or combination vehicle and load, including
407 ADS-equipped vehicles, to be operated on the state highway
408 system of this state for 12 months from the date the permit is
409 issued, even though the vehicle or its load exceeds the
410 maximum limits specified in this article;, provided, that an
411 annual permit shall not authorize the operation of a vehicle
412 including all enforcement tolerances:
413 1. Whose total gross weight exceeds 150,000 pounds;,
414 provided, that gross weights over 100,000 pounds shall require
415 advance routing by the department;
416 2. Whose single axle weight exceeds 22,000 pounds;
417 3. Whose total length exceeds 75 feet;, with the
Page 15

3. Whose total length exceeds 75 feet;, with the
418 exception of mobile homes, whose length limitations, including
419 towing vehicle, shall be 85 feet;
420 4. Whose total width exceeds 120 inches or whose load
421 width exceeds 144 inches;, with the exception of mobile homes,
422 whose width limitation shall be 168 inches;, provided, that
423 mobile homes whose width exceeds 144 inches shall require
424 advance route approval by the department; or
425 5. Whose height exceeds 14 feet.
426 A permit to operate a vehicle whichthat exceeds the
427 statutory limits of height, weight, width, or length shall be
428 issued only on condition of payment of an indemnity bond or
429 proof of insurance protection for three hundred thousand
430 dollars ($300,000.00)($300,000), the bond or insurance
431 protection conditioned for payment to the department to be
432 held in trust for the benefit of the owners of bridges and
433 appurtenances thereof, traffic signals, signs, or other
434 highway structures damaged by a vehicle operating under
435 authority of the overheight permit. The liability under the
436 bond or insurance certificate shall be contingent upon proof
437 of negligence or fault on the part of the permittee, his or
438 her agents, or operators.
439 b. Notwithstanding paragraph a., the director, pursuant
440 to this section, may issue an annual permit to operate a
441 vehicle whichthat exceeds the maximum limits otherwise
442 provided in this article for rubber-tired equipment used
443 solely in the scope and operation of mining refractory grade
444 bauxite. The equipment may not exceed the limits of paragraph
445 a., except that the permit may not authorize the operation of
Page 16

a., except that the permit may not authorize the operation of
446 a vehicle, including enforcement tolerances, which exceeds 16
447 feet in width, exceeds 18 feet in height, or exceeds a single
448 axle weight of 27,000 pounds. In addition, the permit may not
449 authorize the operation of the vehicle on any bridge, over or
450 under any overpass, or on an interstate highway. The fee for
451 the annual permit shall be one hundred dollars ($100).
452 (2) SINGLE TRIP. The director may issue a single trip
453 permit, pursuant to this section, to any vehicle. Nothing in
454 this chapter shall be construed to require the State
455 Department of Transportation to allow the use of automated
456 driving systems or ADS-equipped vehicles in operations
457 requiring a single trip permit under this article.
458 (c) Fees. The director may adopt rules concerning the
459 issuance of permits and charge a fee for the issuance as
460 follows:
461 (1) ANNUAL. Charges for the issuance of annual permits
462 shall be as follows:
463 a. For modular homes, sectional houses, portable
464 buildings, boats, and any vehicle or combination of vehicles,
465 one hundred dollars ($100.00);($100), except, that a vehicle
466 or combination of vehicles having trailer or combination of
467 trailers with sidewalls or roof which has transported modular
468 homes, sectional houses, and portable buildings, after
469 depositing any load, may return unloaded to its point of
470 origin, even though the unloaded vehicles exceed the 55-foot
471 limitation provided for in this article, up to and including
472 12 feet wide and 75 feet long.
473 b. For heavy commodities or equipment, overweight,
Page 17

b. For heavy commodities or equipment, overweight,
474 overlength, overheight, and overwidth, one hundred dollars
475 ($100.00)($100). A tractor and trailer (low boy type), after
476 depositing a load referred to in this subparagraph, may return
477 to its point of origin, even though the unloaded tractor and
478 trailer (low boy type) may exceed the 55-foot limitation
479 provided for in this article up to and including 12 feet wide
480 and 75 feet long.
481 c. For mobile homes up to and including 14 feet wide
482 and 85 feet long, including towing vehicle, one hundred
483 dollars ($100.00)($100).
484 (2) SINGLE TRIP. Charges for the issuance of single
485 trip permits shall be as follows:
486 a. Mobile homes, modular homes, sectional houses,
487 portable buildings, and boats:
488 1. Up to and including 12 feet wide and 75 feet long,
489 ten dollars ($10.00)($10).
490 2. Boats in excess of 12 feet wide, twenty dollars
491 ($20.00)($20).
492 3. Mobile homes, modular homes, sectional houses, and
493 portable buildings in excess of 12 feet wide and/or 75 feet
494 long, twenty dollars ($20.00)($20).
495 b. Heavy commodities or equipment:
496 1. Over on any limitations as to length, height, or
497 width, ten dollars ($10.00)($10).
498 2. Over on weight, as follows:
499 PERMIT
500 WEIGHT PERMITTED
501 FEE
Page 18

WEIGHT PERMITTED
FEE
502 From 80,001 pounds up to 100,000 pounds $ 10.0010
503 From 100,001 pounds up to 125,000
504 30.0030
505 pounds
506 From 125,001 pounds up to 150,000
507 60.0060
508 pounds
509 From 150,001 pounds and over 100.00100
510 c. Miscellaneous:
511 1. Houses, twenty dollars ($20.00)($20).
512 2. Off-the-road equipment, ten dollars ($10.00)($10).
513 3. Other oversized vehicles, loads, and equipment not
514 herein specified, twenty dollars ($20.00)($20).
515 4. Other overheight loads not herein specified, ten
516 dollars ($10.00)($10).
517 (d) Certain vehicles on interstate highways. Under this
518 section, 14 feet-wide vehicles and combination vehicles and
519 load may be issued a permit to travel the interstate highways.
520 (e) The Director of the State Department of
521 Transportation, by rule, may establish limits for combinations
522 of commercial wreckers and towed disabled or abandoned
523 vehicles that exceed the maximum height, weight, or length
524 limitations established by law. The director may establish a
525 permitting method for commercial wreckers and may establish a
526 fee for any permits that are issued. The director may
527 authorize exceptions to any permit required under this
528 subsection or may waive any permit required under this
529 subsection under emergency, exigent, or other extraordinary
Page 19

subsection under emergency, exigent, or other extraordinary
530 conditions. Permits may not be issued to a personan individual
531 or entity that is currently prohibited from operating by a
532 federal or state agency responsible for vehicle safety. The
533 permit authorized by this subsection shall be in addition to
534 any registration requirements as provided for in Chapter 6 of
535 this title and Chapter 12 of Title 40.
536 (f) Violations of federal law, etc. No permit shall be
537 issued under this section if the issuance of the permit would
538 violate United States law or would cause the State of Alabama
539 to lose federal-aid funds. Notwithstanding any provisions of
540 any statute to the contrary, all permit fees collected in
541 accordance with this section shall be paid to the Public Road
542 and Bridge Fund in addition to any sums appropriated therefor
543 to the department.
544 (g) Farm and agricultural commodities and equipment
545 exempt. The term "heavy commodities or equipment," as used in
546 this section, is not intended to include farm and agricultural
547 commodities or equipment, and such farm or agricultural
548 commodities and equipment are exempt from the requirement of
549 obtaining permits for movement on the state highway system of
550 Alabama."
551 "§32-9C-6
552 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in
553 Chapter 9B and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
554 operation of ADS-equipped vehicles and automated driving
555 systems is governed exclusively by this chapter.
556 (b) No state or local entity may impose requirements,
557 including performance standards, specific to the operation of
Page 20

including performance standards, specific to the operation of
558 ADS-equipped vehicles, automated driving systems, or automated
559 commercial motor vehicles as defined in Section 32-9B-1,
560 except as specifically authorized by this chapter. Nothing in
561 this section shall be construed to repeal or in any way modify
562 Section 32-9-29.
563 (c) No municipality or other local or state entity may
564 impose a tax on, or impose requirements on, ADS-equipped
565 vehicles or automated driving systems, where the tax or other
566 requirement relates specifically to the operation of
567 ADS-equipped vehicles.
568 (d) Nothing in this chapter creates a legal duty or
569 otherwise requires the state or any county or municipality to
570 upgrade any part of its transportation network to accommodate
571 the operation of ADS-equipped vehicles or automated driving
572 systems."
573 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
574 1, 2026.
Page 21